Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.060

Comprehensive plan—General.

Every code city, by ordinance, shall direct the planning agency to prepare a comprehensive plan for anticipating and influencing the orderly and coordinated development of land and building uses of the code city and its environs. The comprehensive plan may be prepared as a whole or in successive parts. The plan should integrate transportation and land use planning.

[ 2002 c 189 s 2; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.060.]